Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.220

Basic education—Minimum instructional requirements—Program accessibility—Rules.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5253-S.SL) ***

(1) In order for students to have the opportunity to develop the basic education knowledge and skills under RCW 28A.150.210, school districts must provide instruction of sufficient quantity and quality and give students the opportunity to complete graduation requirements that are intended to prepare them for postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship. The program established under this section shall be the minimum instructional program of basic education offered by school districts.

(2) Each school district shall make available to students the following minimum instructional offering each school year:

(a) For students enrolled in grades one through 12, at least a district-wide annual average of 1,000 hours, which shall be increased beginning in the 2015-16 school year to at least 1,080 instructional hours for students enrolled in grades nine through 12 and at least 1,000 instructional hours for students in grades one through eight, all of which may be calculated by a school district using a district-wide annual average of instructional hours over grades one through 12; and

(b) For students enrolled in kindergarten, at least 450 instructional hours, which shall be increased to at least 1,000 instructional hours according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.

(3) The instructional program of basic education provided by each school district shall include:

(a) Instruction in the state learning standards under RCW 28A.655.070;

(b) Instruction that provides students the opportunity to complete 24 credits for high school graduation. Course distribution requirements may be established by the state board of education under RCW 28A.230.090;

(c) If the state learning standards include a requirement of languages other than English, the requirement may be met by students receiving instruction in one or more American Indian languages;

(d) Supplemental instruction and services for students who are not meeting academic standards through the learning assistance program under RCW 28A.165.005 through 28A.165.065;

(e) Supplemental instruction and services for eligible and enrolled students and exited students whose primary language is other than English through the transitional bilingual instruction program under RCW 28A.180.010 through 28A.180.080;

(f) The opportunity for an appropriate education at public expense as defined by RCW 28A.155.020 for all eligible students with disabilities as defined in RCW 28A.155.020; and

(g) Programs for highly capable students under RCW 28A.185.010 through 28A.185.030.

(4) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to require individual students to attend school for any particular number of hours per day or to take any particular courses.

(5)(a) Each school district's kindergarten through 12th grade basic educational program shall be accessible to all students who are five years of age, as provided by RCW 28A.225.160, and less than 21 years of age and shall consist of a minimum of 180 school days per school year in such grades as are conducted by a school district, and 180 half-days of instruction, or equivalent, in kindergarten, to be increased to a minimum of 180 school days per school year according to the implementation schedule under RCW 28A.150.315.

(b) Schools administering the Washington kindergarten inventory of developing skills may use up to three school days at the beginning of the school year to meet with parents and families as required in the parent involvement component of the inventory.

(c) In the case of students who are graduating from high school, a school district may schedule the last five school days of the 180-day school year for noninstructional purposes including, but not limited to, the observance of graduation and early release from school upon the request of a student. All such students may be claimed as a full-time equivalent student to the extent they could otherwise have been so claimed for the purposes of RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260. Any hours scheduled by a school district for noninstructional purposes during the last five school days for such students shall count toward the instructional hours requirement in subsection (2)(a) of this section.

(6) Subject to RCW 28A.150.276, nothing in this section precludes a school district from enriching the instructional program of basic education, such as offering additional instruction or providing additional services, programs, or activities that the school district determines to be appropriate for the education of the school district's students.

(7) The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement and ensure compliance with the program requirements imposed by this section, RCW 28A.150.250 and 28A.150.260, and such related supplemental program approval requirements as the state board may establish.

[ 2024 c 66 s 10; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 506; 2014 c 217 s 201; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 2; 2013 c 323 s 2; 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 1; 2009 c 548 s 104; 1993 c 371 s 2; (1995 c 77 s 1 and 1993 c 371 s 1 expired September 1, 2000); 1992 c 141 s 503; 1990 c 33 s 105; 1982 c 158 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.58.754.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Finding—Intent—2014 c 217: "The legislature recognizes that preparing students to be successful in postsecondary education, gainful employment, and citizenship requires increased rigor and achievement, including attaining a meaningful high school diploma with the opportunity to earn twenty-four credits. The legislature finds that an investment was made in the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act to implement an increase in instructional hours in the 2014-15 school year. School districts informed the legislature that the funding as provided in the 2013-2015 omnibus appropriations act would result in only a few minutes being added onto each class period and would not result in a meaningful increase in instruction that would have the positive impact on student learning that the legislature expects. The school districts suggested that it would be a better educational policy to use the funds to implement the requirement of twenty-four credits for high school graduation, which will result in a meaningful increase of instructional hours. Based on input from school districts across the state, the legislature recognizes the need to provide flexibility for school districts to implement the increase in instructional hours while still moving towards an increase in the high school graduation requirements. Therefore, the legislature intends to shift the focus and intent of the investments from compliance with the minimum instructional hours offering to assisting school districts to provide an opportunity for students to earn twenty-four credits for high school graduation and obtain a meaningful diploma, beginning with the graduating class of 2019, with the opportunity for school districts to request a waiver for up to two years." [ 2014 c 217 s 1.]

Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 9: "The legislature intends to fund a plan to carry out the reforms enacted in chapter 548, Laws of 2009, and chapter 236, Laws of 2010, and to make the statutory changes necessary to support this plan." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 1.]

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 9: "(1) Sections 2 through 4 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect September 1, 2013.

(2) Section 7 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 30, 2013.

(3) Sections 5, 6, and 8 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect immediately [June 30, 2013]." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 9 s 9.]

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 27 ss 1-3: "Sections 1 through 3 of this act take effect September 1, 2011." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 27 s 8.]

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Contingent expiration date—1995 c 77 s 1: "Section 1 of this act shall expire September 1, 2000. However, section 1 of this act shall not expire if, by September 1, 2000, a law is not enacted stating that a school accountability and academic assessment system is not in place." [ 1995 c 77 s 32.] That law was not enacted by September 1, 2000.

Contingent effective date—1993 c 371 s 2: "Section 2 of this act shall take effect September 1, 2000. However, section 2 of this act shall not take effect if, by September 1, 2000, a law is enacted stating that a school accountability and academic assessment system is not in place." [ 1993 c 371 s 5.] That law was not enacted by September 1, 2000.

Contingent effective date—1992 c 141 ss 502-504, 506, and 507: See note following RCW 28A.150.205.

Findings—Part headings—Severability—1992 c 141: See notes following RCW 28A.410.040.

Severability—1982 c 158: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1982 c 158 s 8.]

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 250: "This amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of section 1, and section 2 of this amendatory act, shall take effect August 15, 1979." [ 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 10.]

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 250: "If any provision of this amendatory act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 ex.s. c 250 s 11.]

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 359: See notes following RCW 28A.150.200.